src/scripts/Macedonian/g2p.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# CyrAlphabet defines all letters including apostrophe for schwa and vocalic R
# CyrA also defines a stress mark for forcing  stress
source CyrAlphabet.foma 
define Word [CLetter|StressMark]+ ; 

define InitialLetterMapping 
î : i0 |  # debug schwa !
а : a0 | 
[е|è|ѐ] : e0 | # accent is only for disambiguation. Could be removed when capitalized
[и|ѝ|ì] : ii0 | # accent is only for disambiguation. Could be removed when capitalized
о : o0 | 
у : u0 | 
ј  :  j |
б : b | 
ѓ : gj | 
г: g | 
д : d | 
#џ : [d zh] | 
џ : dzh | 
ѕ : dz | 
ж : zh | 
з : z | 
к : k | 
л : l | 
м : m | 
н : n | 
њ : nj |
п : p | 
р : r | 
с : s | 
т : t | 
ф : f | 
х : h | 
ц : ts | 
ч : tsh | 
ш : sh | 
в : v |
љ : lj |
ќ : kj |
[%' | ’ ] : ax0 ; 

define InitialTranscription InitialLetterMapping @-> ; 

 source stress_in_text.foma

# we define how to mark an unstressed vowel as stressed. 
# Note that an 'r' phoneme between two consonants can be treated as a semi-vowel to
# form a syllable. e.g  / ts r k v a /   
# when moving to Macednian phonemes, let's try for a semi-vowel, "ry"

define tgStress a0:a1|e0:e1|ii0:ii1|i0:i1|o0:o1|u0:u1|ry0:ry1|ax0:ax1;
#define tgStress a0:a1|e0:e0|ii0:ii1|i0:i1|o0:o1|u0:u1|ry0:ry1|ax0:ax1;
define noStressV  a0 | e0 | ii0 | o0 | u0 | i0 | ry0 | ax0 ;
define stressV  a1 | e1 | ii1 | o1 | u1 | i1 | ax1 ;
define vowel  noStressV  | stressV;
define pc   \vowel;
define pcx   pc - StressMark;
define noStress noStressV | pc | StressMark;

define vowelizeR  r -> [i0 r]  || pc _ pcx ,,
ax0 -> i0 || _ r ; 

# Two passes at adding stress.
# If there is no stress AND there are three or more syllables, put the stress on the third from last syllable
# If there is still no stress, then put the stress on the first front syllable.
# TBW:  Special -ki ending to a word moves stress to second last syllable
# Note, double vowels exist, we treat them HERE as long vowels, not two.

define markedStressRule StressMark tgStress -> ||   _ ;  #  convert any unstresssed vowel preceded by a stress mark
define adverbkiStressRule tgStress -> ||  .#. noStress* _ j kj ii0 .#.;
define stressedSuffixes # these should really go into stress dictionary 
 [ii0 r a0 m] : [ii1 r a0 m ] |  # ирам
 [ii0 r a0 sh] : [ii1 r a0 sh] |  # ираш
 [ii0 r a0] : [ii1 r a0] |  # ира
 [ii0 r a0 v] : [ii1 r a0 v] |  # ирав
 [ii0 r a0 l] : [ii1 r a0 l] |   # ирал 
 [ii0 r a0 j] : [ii1 r a0 j] |   # ирај 
 [u0 r a0] : [u1 r a0  ] |    # ура
 [l o0 g] : [l o1 g ] |  # лог
 [ii0 s t] : [ii1 s t ] |  # ист
 [t e0 t] : [t e1 t ]  |  # тет  
 [f o0 n] : [f o1 n] |  # фон
 [f o0 n o t] : [f o1 n o t] | # фонот
 [f o0 n o v] : [f o1 n o v] | # фонов
 [f o0 n o n] : [f o1 n o n] | #  фонон
 [f o0 n i0] : [f o1 n i0] ; # фони
define stressSuffixRule  stressedSuffixes -> || .#. noStress* _ .#.;
define antePenultStressRule tgStress -> ||  .#. noStress* _ pc* noStressV pc* noStressV pc* .#.;
define frontStressRule tgStress -> ||  .#. pc* _ noStress* .#.;

define StressRules 
markedStressRule
.o.  [StressMark -> 0] 
.o. adverbkiStressRule 
### .o. stressSuffixRule #  moved to stress dictionary
.o. antePenultStressRule 
.o. frontStressRule 
; 

define SoftenLRule l -> lj || _  [ii0 | ii1 | e0 | e1 | j] ; 
source latin_convert.foma
source unstressed_words.foma
source downcase.foma
source  stress_dictionary.foma

define TranscriptionRules  
Word .o. 
InitialTranscription
#.o. SoftenLRule 
.o. vowelizeR ; 

# To be written
# In order to handle words which are in the stress dictionary which might be in uppercase and/or latin
# we need to take the Downcase .o. LatinConvert out of TranscriptionRules
# and run them before the .P. below.
source abbrevs.foma 
define Rules  
[AbbrevTranslation] .P.
[Downcase .o.  LatinConvert] .o. 
 [[UnstressedWords .o. TranscriptionRules] .P. 
  [ApplyStressDictionary .o. TranscriptionRules .o. StressRules]] 
.o. SoftenLRule 
	;

regex Rules ; 
